Maryland, session 2026, HB1468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–342.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR” MEANS A PREGNANT INDIVIDUAL
WHO PRESENTS AT A HOSPITAL WITH SIGNS OR SYMPTOMS OF LABOR, ACCORDING
TO GENERALLY ACCEPTED STANDARDS OF OBSTETRIC PRACTICE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1468*

HOUSE BILL 1468
(3) “SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLAN” MEANS A WRITTEN PLAN THAT
MUST BE COMPLETED BEFORE A PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR MAY BE DISCHARGED
OR TRANSFERRED.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EMERGENCY TRANSFER OF A
PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR.
(C) A HOSPITAL MAY NOT DISCHARGE OR TRANSFER A PATIENT IN ACTIVE
LABOR UNLESS THE HOSPITAL AND THE PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR FIRST
COMPLETE A SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLAN.
(D) A SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLAN SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE CLINICAL JUSTIFICATION FOR THE DISCHARGE OR
TRANSFER OF THE PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR BASED ON THE MEDICAL ASSESSMENT
OF A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER LICENSED UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE WHO IS INVOLVED IN THE LABOR AND DELIVERY PROCESS;
(2) AN ASSESSMENT OF THE DISTANCE BETWEEN THE HOSPITAL AND
THE INTENDED DESTINATION OF THE PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR, INCLUDING AN
EVALUATION OF WHETHER THE TRAVEL IS SAFE CONSIDERING THE CONDITION OF
THE PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR;
(3) A WRITTEN, PLAIN–LANGUAGE ACKNOWLEDGEMENT, SIGNED BY
THE PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR, EXPLAINING:
(I) THE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH BEING DISCHARGED;
(II) A LIST OF SIGNS OR SYMPTOMS INDICATING THAT THE
PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR SHOULD RETURN TO A HOSPITAL; AND
(III) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE HOSPITAL OR AN
ALTERNATIVE FACILITY FOR REASSESSMENT; AND
(4) DOCUMENTATION THAT CONFIRMS THE PATIENT IN ACTIVE
LABOR UNDERSTANDS THE SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLAN, INCLUDING THE RISKS,
POTENTIAL COMPLICATIONS, AND WHAT TO DO IF LABOR INTENSIFIES OR
COMPLICATIONS OCCUR.
(E) A HOSPITAL SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1468 3
(1) MAINTAIN RECORDS OF ALL SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLANS
COMPLETED UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING THE SIGNED ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF
THE SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLAN, FOR AT LEAST 21 YEARS AFTER THE PATIENT IN
ACTIVE LABOR IS DISCHARGED OR TRANSFERRED;
(2) PROVIDE ANNUAL TRAINING TO ALL PATIENT CARE STAFF
MEMBERS WHO WORK IN OBSTETRIC, LABOR, DELIVERY, AND EMERGENCY CARE
THAT ADDRESSES:
(I) MATERNAL HEALTH AND PREGNANCY–RELATED
CONDITIONS;
(II) BEST PRACTICES IN COMMUNICATION AND
PATIENT–CENTERED CARE;
(III) RACIAL AND ETHNIC DISPARITIES IN MATERNAL CARE; AND
(IV) RESPECTFUL TREATMENT OF ALL PATIENTS IN ACTIVE
LABOR, REGARDLESS OF RACE, ETHNICITY, SOCIOECONOMIC STATUS, OR
INSURANCE COVERAGE; AND
(3) CONSPICUOUSLY POST COPIES OF A PATIENT’S RIGHTS UNDER
THIS SECTION, INCLUDING THE RIGHT OF A PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR TO HAVE A
SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLAN BEFORE BEING DISCHARGED OR TRANSFERRED, ON
THE HOSPITAL’S WEBSITE AND IN THE LABOR AND DELIVERY DEPARTMENT.
(F) A HOSPITAL MAY USE A TRAINING DEVELOPED AND ACCREDITED BY A
THIRD PARTY TO SATISFY THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF
THIS SECTION IF THE TRAINING OTHERWISE SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS A HOSPITAL HAS VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) IMPOSE A CIVIL MONETARY PENALTY OF $25,000 PER
VIOLATION;
(II) REQUIRE THE HOSPITAL TO ESTABLISH A PLAN OF
CORRECTION TO PREVENT FUTURE VIOLATIONS; AND
(III) IF APPLICABLE, REFER A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE VIOLATION TO THE APPROPRIATE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
BOARD FOR DISCIPLINE.

HOUSE BILL 1468
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS A HOSPITAL HAS VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (E)(1) OR (3) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE
HOSPITAL OF THE VIOLATION AND ALLOW THE HOSPITAL TO ADDRESS THE
DEFICIENCY;
(II) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, IMPOSE A CIVIL MONETARY
PENALTY OF $5,000; AND
(III) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, INCREASE THE
FREQUENCY WITH WHICH THE DEPARTMENT INSPECTS THE HOSPITAL FOR
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT A HOSPITAL HAS VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF $5,000 FOR EACH YEAR THE
HOSPITAL HAS FAILED TO PROVIDE THE REQUIRED TRAINING; AND
(II) REQUIRE THE HOSPITAL TO PROVIDE THE MANDATORY
TRAINING WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER NOTICE OF THE VIOLATION IS PROVIDED.
(H) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, EACH
HOSPITAL SHALL SUBMIT AN ANONYMIZED REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE NUMBER OF DISCHARGES OR TRANSFERS OF PATIENTS IN
ACTIVE LABOR MADE WITH SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLANS;
(2) THE NUMBER OF DISCHARGES OR TRANSFERS OF PATIENTS IN
ACTIVE LABOR MADE WITHOUT A SAFE DISCHARGE LABOR PLAN AND THE REASON
THOSE DISCHARGES OR TRANSFERS WERE MADE WITHOUT A SAFE DISCHARGE
LABOR PLAN; AND
(3) ANY ADVERSE EVENTS THAT OCCURRED FOLLOWING THE
DISCHARGE OR TRANSFER OF A PATIENT IN ACTIVE LABOR, INCLUDING ANY
REPORTS OF BIRTHS OCCURRING OUTSIDE THE HOSPITAL AND ANY
COMPLICATIONS.
(I) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1468 5
(1) COMPILE THE REPORTS SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) SUBMIT THE COMPILATION AND ANY RELATED
RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.